District of Columbia statutes.
1-606.11

Rules.

Within 45 days of May 15, 1990, the Office shall, pursuant to § 1-606.02, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of §§ 1-604.06, 1-606.01, 1-606.03(c), and 1-606.06 to 1-606.10. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 610
as added May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-127, § 2(e), 37 DCR 2093
Merit system, educational service, rules and regulations, see § 1-608.01a.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Merit system, organization for personnel management, rules and regulations, see § 1-604.04.
1981 Ed., § 1-606.11.